Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Chapter 65. Mining License Tax.

Administrative Code. —

For mining license tax, see 15 AAC 65.

Sec. 43.65.010.
Mining license; mining license tax.

A person prosecuting or attempting to prosecute, or engaging in the business of mining in the state shall obtain a license from the department. All new mining operations are exempt from the tax levied by this chapter for three and one-half years after production begins.

The Department of Natural Resources shall certify to the department the date upon which production begins, and the department shall issue a certificate of exemption to the producer accordingly.

The license tax on mining is as follows: upon the net income of the taxpayer from the property in the state, computed with allowable depletion, plus royalty received in connection with mining property in the state

Where mining operations are conducted in two or more places by one person the operations are considered a single mining operation and the tax under this chapter is computed upon the aggregate income derived from all the mining operations. The lessor of a mine operated under a lease is considered to be engaged in mining within this chapter, and the royalties received by the lessor are considered to be the net income of the lessor’s mining operations. If the lessor receives royalties from more than one mine or mining operation, the tax payable under this chapter by the lessor is computed upon the aggregate royalties received by the lessor from all the mines or mining operations as though they were a single mining operation.

The allowance for depletion included as an allowable deduction from gross income is a percentage of the gross income from the property during the taxable year, excluding from the gross income an amount equal to the rents or royalties paid by the taxpayer in respect to the property, as follows:

coal mines: 10 percent;

metal mines, fluorspar, flake graphite, vermiculite, beryl, feldspar, mica, talc, lepidolite, spodumene, varite, ball and sagger clay, or rock asphalt mines and potash mines or deposits: 15 percent; and

sulphur mines or deposits: 23 percent.

The allowance for depletion may not exceed 50 percent of the net income of the taxpayer, computed without allowance for depletion, from the property, except that in no case may the depletion allowable be less than it would be if computed on a reasonable cost basis.

Deductions that are not directly attributable to particular properties or processes shall be fairly allocated. To illustrate: If the taxpayer engages in activities in addition to mineral extraction in the state and to ordinary treatment processes, deductions for depreciation, taxes, general expenses, and overhead, which cannot be directly attributed to a specific activity, shall be fairly apportioned between (1) the mineral extraction and ordinary treatment processes, and (2) the additional activities, taking into account the ratio which the operating expenses directly attributable to the mineral extraction and ordinary treatment processes bear to the operating expenses directly attributable to the additional activities. If more than one mineral property is involved, the deductions apportioned to the mineral extraction and ordinary treatment processes shall, in turn, be fairly apportioned to the several properties taking into account their relative production.

Taxes upon royalties shall be paid by the taxpayer receiving the royalties and no deduction, excepting depletion, is allowed.

A license issued under this section must include

the name and address of the licensee;

the nature or type of mining activity to be conducted; and

the year for which the license is issued.

over $40,000 and not over $50,000 . . . . .
3 percent

over $50,000 and not over $100,000 . . . . .
$1,500 plus 5 percent of the excess over $50,000

over $100,000 . . . . .
$4,000 plus 7 percent of the excess over $100,000.

History.

(§ 35-1-31 (a) — (c), (e), (f) ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 1951; §§ 1, 2 ch 26 SLA 1953; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 14 SLA 1962; am § 43 ch 113 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 2012)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing and filing requirements, see 15 AAC 65, art. 1.

For computation of tax, see 15 AAC 65, art. 2.

For exemption from tax, see 15 AAC 65, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 3, ch. 28, SLA 2012, the 2012 amendment to (a) of this section is retroactive to January 1, 2012.

Sec. 43.65.018.
Mining business education credit.

A person engaged in the business of mining in the state is allowed a credit against the tax due under this chapter for contributions of cash or equipment accepted for

direct instruction, research, and educational support purposes, including library and museum acquisitions, and contributions to endowment, by an Alaska university foundation, by a nonprofit, public or private, Alaska two-year or four-year college accredited by a national or regional accreditation association, or by a public or private nonprofit elementary or secondary school in the state;

secondary school level vocational education courses, programs, and facilities by a school district in the state;

vocational education courses, programs, and facilities by a state- operated vocational technical education and training school;

a facility by a nonprofit, public or private, Alaska two-year or four-year college accredited by a national or regional accreditation association or by a public or private nonprofit elementary or secondary school in the state;

Alaska Native cultural or heritage programs and educational support, including mentoring and tutoring, provided by a nonprofit agency for public school staff and for students who are in grades kindergarten through 12 in the state;

education, research, rehabilitation, and facilities by an institution that is located in the state and that qualifies as a coastal ecosystem learning center under the Coastal America Partnership established by the federal government;

the Alaska higher education investment fund under AS

37.14.750

;

funding a scholarship awarded by a nonprofit organization to a dual-credit student to defray the cost of a dual-credit course, including the cost of

tuition and textbooks;

registration, course, and programmatic student fees;

on-campus room and board at the postsecondary institution in the state that provides the dual-credit course;

transportation costs to and from a residential school approved by the Department of Education and Early Development under AS

14.16.200

or the postsecondary school in the state that provides the dual-credit course; and

other related educational and programmatic costs;

constructing, operating, or maintaining a residential housing facility by a residential school approved by the Department of Education and Early Development under AS

14.16.200

;

childhood early learning and development programs and educational support to childhood early learning and development programs provided by a nonprofit corporation organized under AS 10.20, a tribal entity, or a school district in the state, by the Department of Education and Early Development, or through a state grant;

science, technology, engineering, and math programs provided by a nonprofit agency or a school district for school staff and for students in grades kindergarten through 12 in the state; and

the operation of a nonprofit organization dedicated to providing educational opportunities that promote the legacy of public service contributions to the state and perpetuate ongoing educational programs that foster public service leadership for future generations of residents of the state.

The amount of the credit is 50 percent of contributions.

Each public college and university shall include in its annual operating budget request contributions received and how the contributions were used.

A contribution claimed as a credit under this section may not

be the basis for a credit claimed under another provision of this title; and

when combined with contributions that are the basis for credits taken during the taxpayer’s tax year under AS

21.96.070

, AS

43.20.014

, AS

43.55.019

, AS

43.56.018

, AS

43.75.018

, or AS

43.77.045

, result in the total amount of the credits exceeding $1,000,000; if the taxpayer is a member of an affiliated group, then the total amount of credits may not exceed $1,000,000 for the affiliated group; in this paragraph, “affiliated group” has the meaning given in AS

43.20.145

.

The credit under this section may not reduce a person’s tax liability under this chapter to below zero for any tax year. An unused credit or portion of a credit not used under this section for a tax year may not be sold, traded, transferred, or applied in a subsequent tax year.

To qualify for a credit under this section, equipment must be appraised consistent with regulations adopted by the department to determine the value of the contribution for purposes of this section.

In this section,

“dual-credit student” means a secondary level student in the state who simultaneously earns college and high school credit for a course;

“nonprofit organization” means a charitable or educational organization in the state that is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) (Internal Revenue Code);

“school district” has the meaning given in AS

43.20.014

;

“vocational education” has the meaning given in AS

43.20.014

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 58 SLA 1987; am § 51 ch 21 SLA 1991; am §§ 8, 9, 12 ch 71 SLA 1991; am § 7 ch 21 SLA 1994; am § 20 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 19 ch 81 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 86 SLA 2000; am §§ 16, 17 ch 46 SLA 2002; am § 5 ch 48 SLA 2008; am §§ 34, 36, 38, 40 ch 92 SLA 2010; am § 9 ch 7 FSSLA 2011; am § 10 ch 6 SLA 2012; am § 20 ch 74 SLA 2012; am §§ 39, 41 ch 15 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 2018; am §§ 21 — 25 ch 101 SLA 2018)

Delayed repeal of section in 2025. —

Under secs. 21 and 37, ch. 61, SLA 2014, as amended by sec. 40, ch. 101, SLA 2018, this section is repealed January 1, 2025.

Revisor's notes. —

In 1991, to harmonize the amendments made by chs. 21 and 71, SLA 1991, the words “by an Alaska” were inserted before “university foundation” in (a) of this section.

In 2002, in (d) of this section, “ AS

43.56.018

” was substituted for “ AS

43.65.018

” to correct a manifest typographical error in
ch. 86, SLA 2000.

In 2010, in (d)(2) of this section “AS

21.96.070

,

21.96.075

” was substituted for “AS 21.89.070,

21.89.075

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 21.89.070 and

21.89.075

.

In 2012, in (d)(2) of this section, “ AS

43.20.145

” was substituted for “ AS

43.20.073

” to reflect the 2012 renumbering of
AS

43.20.073

.

In 2010 and 2018, this section was reorganized to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes; subsection (e) was enacted as (f) in 2010 and subsection (f) was enacted as (g) in 2018. In 2014, the paragraphs in subsection (f) [now (g)] were reorganized to maintain alphabetical order.

In 2018, “AS

21.96.075

,” was deleted from paragraph (d)(2) to harmonize the repeal of AS

21.96.075

by sec. 1, ch. 62, SLA 2018, effective January 1, 2019, with the changes made by ch. 101, SLA 2018.

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 15, SLA 2014, see 2014 House Journal 1434 — 1437.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective January 1, 2009, rewrote the section.

The 2010 amendment, effective January 1, 2011, in (a)(2), added “, and facilities” following “programs”, in (a)(3), added “for vocational education courses, pro- grams, and facilities” preceding “by a state-operated vocational”, added (a)(4), and made related changes; in (b)(2), substituted “$200,000” for “$100,000”, added (b)(3), and made related changes; in (d)(1), substituted “be the basis for a credit claimed” for “be claimed as a credit”, in (b)(2), added “contributions that are the basis for” following “when combined with”, substituted “result in the total amount of the credits exceeding $5,000,000; if the taxpayer is a member of an affiliated group, then the total amount of credits may not exceed $5,000,000 for the affiliated group; in this paragraph, “affiliated group” has the meaning given in AS

43.20.073

” for “exceed $150,000”; added (e).

The 2011 amendment, effective July 23, 2011, inserted “or an annual intercollegiate sports tournament” in (a)(4), added (a)(5) and (a)(6), and made a related change.

The first 2012 amendment, effective March 24, 2012, in (f)(1) [now (g)(1)], substituted “AS

43.20.014

” for “AS

14.03.126

”.

The second 2012 amendment, effective September 14, 2012, added (a)(7), and made stylistic changes.

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (a), in (a)(1) and (a)(4), added “, or by a public or private nonprofit elementary or secondary school in the state” at the end, in (a)(4) deleted “or an annual intercollegiate sports tournament” following “a facility”, added (a)(8) — (12) and made a related change; in (g) added (g)(1) and (2) [enacted as (f)(3) and (4)].

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), in the introductory language, substituted “contributions of cash or equipment” for “cash contribution”; in (a)(1) and (4), inserted “national or” preceding “regional accreditation”; in (b)(2), substituted “75 percent” for “100 percent” at the beginning; in (d)(2), twice substituted “$1,000,000” for “$5,000,000”; added (g) [now (f)].

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2021, rewrote (b).

Sec. 43.65.019.
Alaska veterans’ memorial endowment fund contribution credit. [Repealed, § 25 ch 46, SLA 2002.]

Sec. 43.65.020.
Taxpayer’s duties.

A person subject to tax under this chapter shall make a return stating specifically the items of gross income from the property, including royalty received and the deductions and credits allowed by this chapter and the exploration incentive credit authorized by AS 27.30, and other information for carrying out this chapter that the department prescribes. The return must show the mining license number and must be signed by the taxpayer or an authorized agent of the taxpayer, under penalty of unsworn falsification in the second degree. If receivers, trustees, or assigns are operating the property or business, they shall make returns for the person engaged in mining, or the recipient of royalty in connection with mining property. The tax due on the basis of the returns shall be collected in the same manner as if collected from the person of whose business they have custody and control. In a tax year in which a taxpayer applies against the tax levied under this chapter the exploration incentive credit authorized by AS 27.30, the commissioner shall require the taxpayer to submit the accounting of mining operation activities form required by AS

27.30.030(b)

.

A return made on the basis of the calendar year shall be made before May 1 of the next year. A return made on the basis of a fiscal year shall be made before the first day of the fifth month of the next fiscal year.

The department may grant a reasonable extension of time for filing returns, under regulations adopted by it. Except in the case of a taxpayer going abroad, an extension may not be made for more than six months.

A taxpayer shall make a return either on a calendar year or fiscal year basis, in conformance with the basis used in making the taxpayer’s return for federal income tax purposes.

The total amount of tax imposed by this chapter shall be paid on the 30th day of April of the next calendar year, or, if the return is made on the basis of the fiscal year, then on the last day of the fourth month of the next fiscal year.

Every person prosecuting or attempting to prosecute or engaging in the business of mining in the state shall comply with the department’s regulations and shall keep such records, give such statements under oath, and make such returns as the department prescribes.

When the department considers it necessary, it may require a person, by notice served upon the person, to make a return, give statements under oath, or keep records as it considers sufficient to show whether or not the person is liable to tax under this chapter. If a person fails to file a return at the time prescribed by law or regulation, or makes, wilfully or otherwise, a false or fraudulent return, the department shall make the return from its own knowledge and from such information as it can obtain through testimony or otherwise. A return so made and subscribed by the department is prima facie good and sufficient for all legal purposes.

History.

(§ 35-1-32 ACLA 1949; am § 52 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 5 ch 86 SLA 1995; am § 26 ch 42 SLA 2006; am § 5 ch 20 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing and filing requirements, see 15 AAC 65, art. 1.

For exemption from tax, see 15 AAC 65, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 1, 2016, in (d), deleted the first sentence, which read “A taxpayer’s return shall be made to the department at Juneau.”

Sec. 43.65.030.
Application for renewals.

Application for renewal of a mining license shall be made before May 1 of each year.

History.

(§ 35-1-35 ACLA 1949)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing and filing requirements, see 15 AAC 65, art. 1.

Sec. 43.65.040.
Limitation. [Repealed, § 4 ch 94 SLA 1976. For current law, see AS 43.05.260.]

Sec. 43.65.050.
Violations and penalties. [Repealed, § 4 ch 94 SLA 1976; § 3 ch 166 SLA 1976; §§ 45, 46 ch 113 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 43.05.220 and 43.05.290.]

Sec. 43.65.060.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“gross income from property” means the gross income from mining in the state;

“mining” means an operation by which valuable metals, ores, minerals, asbestos, gypsum, coal, or stone, or any of them are extracted, mined, or taken from the earth; “mining” includes the ordinary treatment processes normally applied by mine owners or operators to obtain the commercially marketable product, but does not include the extraction or production of oil and gas, marketable earth, quarry rock, or sand and gravel;

“net income of the taxpayer (computed without allowances for depletion) from the property” means the gross income from the property, less allowable deductions attributable to the mineral property upon which the depletion is claimed and the allowable deductions attributable to ordinary treatment processes insofar as they relate to the product of the property, including overhead and operating expenses, development costs properly charged to expense, depreciation, taxes, losses sustained, etc., but excluding allowances for depletion, and deductions for federal income taxes, or for the tax imposed by this chapter;

“new mining operations” means mining operations which began production after January 1, 1953, or which have not been liable to pay a mining license tax under this chapter on net income since January 1, 1948;

“ordinary treatment processes” includes

in the case of coal: cleaning, breaking, sizing, and loading for shipment,

in the case of sulphur: pumping to vats, cooling, breaking, and loading for shipment,

in the case of iron ore, bauxite, ball and sagger clay, rock asphalt, and minerals which are customarily sold in the form of crude mineral product: sorting, concentrating, and sintering to bring to shipping grade and form, and loading for shipment, and

in the case of lead, zinc, copper, gold, silver, platinum metals or fluorspar ores, potash and ores which are not customarily sold in the form of the crude mineral product: crushing, grinding, and beneficiation by concentration (gravity, flotation, amalgamation, electrostatic, or magnetic), cyanidation, leaching, crystallization, precipitation (but excluding electrolytic deposition roasting, thermal or electric smelting or refining), or by substantially equivalent processes or combination of processes used in the separation or extraction of a product from the ore, including the furnacing or quicksilver ore;

“production” means the date on which the initial shipment of products from mining operations is made.

History.

(§ 35-1-31(a), (d), (e) ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 1951; am §§ 1, 2 ch 26 SLA 1953; am § 1 ch 14 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 28 SLA 2012)

Administrative Code. —

For computation of tax, see 15 AAC 65, art. 2.

For exemption from tax, see 15 AAC 65, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 3, ch. 28, SLA 2012, the 2012 amendment to paragraph (2) of this section is retroactive to January 1, 2012.